Utah statutes.
20A-7-305.   Obtaining signatures -- Verification -- Removal of signature.
(1)  A Utah voter may sign a referendum petition if the voter is a legal
voter.
(2)  The sponsors shall ensure that the person in whose presence each
signature sheet was signed:
(a)  is at least 18 years old and meets the residency requirements of Section
20A-2-105; and
(b)  verifies each signature sheet by completing the verification printed on
the last page of each signature sheet.
(3) (a) (i)  A voter who has signed a referendum petition may have the voter's
signature removed from the petition by submitting to the county clerk a
statement requesting that the voter's signature be removed.
(b)  The statement shall include:
(i)  the name of the voter;
(ii)  the resident address at which the voter is registered to vote;
(iii)  the last four digits of the voter's Social Security number;
(iv)  the driver license or identification card number; and
(v)  the signature of the voter.
(c)  A voter may not submit a statement by email or other electronic means.
(d)  In order for the signature to be removed, the statement must be received
by the county clerk before the day which is 55 days after the end of the
legislative session at which the law passed.
(e)  The county clerk shall deliver all statements received under this
Subsection (3):
(i)  with the referendum petition packets to the lieutenant governor; or
(ii)  in a supplemental delivery to the lieutenant governor for a statement
submitted after the county clerk delivered the referendum petition packets.
(f)  A person may only remove a signature from a referendum petition in
accordance with this Subsection (3).
